California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
If any tangible personal property covered by this section is not salable at public auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or if it has no intrinsic value, or if its value is not sufficient to justify its retention by the superintendent to be offered for sale at public auction or upon a sealed-bid basis at a later date, the superintendent may order it destroyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4468.

Before any money or other personal property or documents are delivered to the State Treasurer, State Controller, or public administrator, or sold at auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or destroyed, under the provisions of Section 4466, and before any personal property or documents are delivered to the public administrator, or sold at auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or destroyed, under the provisions of Section 4467, notice of such intended disposition shall be posted at least 30 days prior to the disposition, in a public place at the institution where the disposition is to be made, and a copy of such notice shall be mailed to the last known address of the owner or deceased owner, at least 30 days prior to such disposition. The notice prescribed by this section need not specifically describe each item of property to be disposed of.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4469.

At the time of delivering any money or other personal property to the State Treasurer or State Controller under the provisions of Section 4126 or of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the superintendent shall deliver to the State Controller a schedule setting forth a statement and description of all money and other personal property delivered, and the name and last known address of the owner or deceased owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4470.

When any personal property has been destroyed as provided in Section 4466 or 4467, no suit shall thereafter be maintained by any person against the state or any officer thereof for or on account of such property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4471.

All day hospitals and rehabilitation centers maintained by the State Department of Developmental Services shall be subject to the provisions of this code pertaining to the admission, transfer, and discharge of patients at the state hospitals, except that all admissions to such facilities shall be subject to the approval of the chief officer thereof. Charges for services rendered to patients at such facilities shall be determined pursuant to Section 4431. The liability for such charges shall be governed by the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 6715) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 6 of this code and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 7 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4472.

The state hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services shall comply with the California Food Sanitation Act, Article 1 (commencing with Section 111950) of Chapter 4 of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

The state hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services shall also comply with the California Uniform Retail Food Facilities Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 113700) of Part 7 of Division 104.

Sanitation, health and hygiene standards that have been adopted by a city, county, or city and county that are more strict than those of the California Uniform Retail Food Facilities Law or the California Food Sanitation Act shall not be applicable to state hospitals that are under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 462.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4473.

Whenever a patient dies in a state hospital for the developmentally disabled and the coroner finds that the death was by accident or at the hands of another person other than by accident, the State Department of Developmental Services shall determine upon review of the coroner’s investigation if such death resulted from the negligence, recklessness, or intentional act of a state employee. If it is determined that such death directly resulted from the negligence, recklessness, or intentional act of a state employee, the department shall immediately notify the State Personnel Board and any appropriate licensing agency and shall terminate the employment of such employee as provided by law. In addition, if such state employee is a licensed mental health professional, the appropriate licensing board shall inquire into the circumstances of such death, examine the findings of the coroner’s investigation, and make a determination of whether such mental health professional should have his license revoked or suspended or be subject to other disciplinary action. “Licensed mental health professional,” as used in this section, means a person licensed by any board, bureau, department, or agency pursuant to a state law and employed in a state hospital for the developmentally disabled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.

Each patient in a state hospital for the developmentally disabled who has resided in the state hospital for a period of at least 30 days shall be paid an amount of aid for his or her personal and incidental needs which when added to his or her income equals twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) per month.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4473 (as added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 250.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.1.

(a) Whenever the State Department of Developmental Services proposes the closure of a state developmental center, the department shall be required to submit a detailed plan to the Legislature not later than April 1 immediately prior to the fiscal year in which the plan is to be implemented, and as a part of the Governor’s proposed budget. A plan submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section, including any modifications made pursuant to subdivision (b), shall not be implemented without the approval of the Legislature.

(b) A plan submitted on or before April 1 immediately prior to the fiscal year in which the plan is to be implemented may be subsequently modified during the legislative review process.

(c) Prior to submission of the plan to the Legislature, the department shall solicit input from the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the Association of Regional Center Agencies, the protection and advocacy agency specified in Section 4901, the local regional center, consumers living in the developmental center, parents, family members, guardians, and conservators of persons living in the developmental centers or their representative organizations, persons with developmental disabilities living in the community, developmental center employees and employee organizations, community care providers, the affected city and county governments, and business and civic organizations, as may be recommended by local state Senate and Assembly representatives.

(d) Prior to the submission of the plan to the Legislature, the department shall confer with the county in which the developmental center is located, the regional centers served
 by the developmental center, and other state departments using similar occupational classifications, to develop a program for the placement of staff of the developmental center planned for closure in other developmental centers, as positions become vacant, or in similar positions in programs operated by, or through contract with, the county, regional centers, or other state departments, including, but not limited to, the community state staff program, use of state staff for mobile health and crisis teams in the community, and use of state staff in new state-operated models that may be developed as a component of the closure plan.

(e) Prior to the submission of the plan to the Legislature, the department shall confer with the county in which the developmental center is located, and shall consider recommendations for the use of the developmental center property.

(f) Prior to the
 submission of the plan to the Legislature, the department shall hold at least one public hearing in the community in which the developmental center is located, with public comment from that hearing summarized in the plan.

(g) The plan submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the land and buildings at the developmental center.

(2) A description of existing lease arrangements at the developmental center.

(3) A description of resident characteristics, including, but not limited to, age, gender, ethnicity, family involvement, years of developmental center residency, developmental disability, and other factors that will determine service and support needs.

(4) A description of stakeholder input provided pursuant to subdivisions (c), (d), and (e), including a description of local issues, concerns, and recommendations regarding the proposed closure, and alternative uses of the developmental center property.

(5) The impact on residents and their families.

(6) A description of the unique and specialized services provided by the developmental center, including, but not limited to, crisis facilities, health and dental clinics, and adaptive technology services.

(7) A description of the assessment process and community placement decision process that will ensure necessary services and supports are in place prior to a resident transitioning into the community.

(8) Anticipated alternative placements for residents.

(9) A description of how the department will transition the client rights advocacy contract provided at the developmental center pursuant to Section 4433 to the community.

(10) A description of how the well-being of the residents will be monitored during and following their transition into the community.

(11) The impact on regional center services.

(12) Where services will be obtained that, upon closure of the developmental center, will no longer be provided by that facility.

(13) A description of the potential job opportunities for developmental center employees, activities the
 department will undertake to support employees through the closure process, and other efforts made to mitigate the effect of the closure on employees.

(14) The fiscal impact of the closure.

(15) The timeframe in which closure will be accomplished.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 14.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, on or before October 1, 2015, the Department of Developmental Services shall submit to the Legislature a plan or plans to close one or more developmental centers. The plan or plans shall meet the requirements of subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive of Section 4474.1, and shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site. The department may develop community resources and otherwise engage in activities for transitioning developmental center residents into the community, and utilize funds allocated for that purpose as part of the annual Budget Act that is enacted at the 2015–16 Regular Session of the Legislature. Implementation of a plan following the 2015–16 fiscal year is contingent upon legislative approval of the plan as part
 of the legislative budget process during the 2016–17 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(b) A plan submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section may subsequently be modified during the legislative review process. Modifications may include changes based on stakeholder and county-designated advisory group comments, as well as recommendations made by the county in which the developmental center is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 23, Sec. 6.   (SB 82)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.12.

(a) The department shall seek to modify the contract in existence on January 1, 2017, for the conduct of a movers longitudinal study to include all of the following:

(1) A requirement that at least 250 individuals who meet the following criteria participate in the study:

(A) Volunteered to participate in the study.

(B) Proportionately selected from among individuals who have moved into the community from Sonoma Developmental Center, Fairview Developmental Center, or Porterville Developmental Center.

(C) Proportionately selected from among individuals who have moved
 into the community at different stages of the closure process.

(2) A requirement that the study follow a sample of individuals described in paragraph (1) for a two-year period after the individual moves into the community from the developmental center.

(3) A requirement that the study include individuals who move into the community from a developmental center during the first year of the study, and during each subsequent year of the study, until the developmental centers identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) close.

(4) A requirement that researchers conducting the study meet with each individual participating in the study at intervals of three months, six months, one year, and two years following the person’s move into the community from the developmental center to discuss the individual’s quality of life
 and services and supports.

(b) The movers longitudinal study described in this section is one element of the quality assurance instrument required pursuant to Section 4571.

(c) (1) For purposes of conducting the study, the department shall maintain and update the addresses of, and contact information for, former residents of the centers who relocated as a result of the closure of the centers.

(2) The department shall ensure, to the extent permitted by law, that researchers conducting the study have access to data and other information necessary to conduct the study, including the addresses of, and contact information for, former residents of the centers who relocated due to the closure of the centers.

(d) The department shall
 annually submit interim reports to the Legislature regarding the study in accordance with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code. The reports shall include information about consumer and family satisfaction and adequacy of community services. Upon the completion of the study as described in subdivision (a), the department shall submit the study to the Legislature, in accordance with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 15.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.15.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services shall include an update to the Legislature in the 2017–18 May Revision regarding how the department will provide access to crisis services after the closure of a developmental center and how the state will maintain its role in providing residential services to those whom private sector vendors cannot or will not serve. As part of this plan, the department shall assess the option of expanding the community state staff program authorized in Section 4474.2 to allow the department’s employees to serve as regional crisis management teams that provide assessment, consultation, and resolution for persons with developmental disabilities in crisis in the community.

(b) The State Department of Developmental Services
 shall post on its Internet Web site a monthly progress report regarding the development of residential capacity by each regional center. The report shall include information on monthly targets for individuals moving out of a developmental center based on transition activities and community resource development activities by each regional center. The report shall also provide an explanation of any targets that have not been met.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2017, and until December 31, 2020, the State Department of Developmental Services shall provide quarterly updates to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the steps foreseen, planned, and completed in the development of services under the department’s update to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a), including any planned services or residences intended to facilitate transitions or diversions from institutes for mental disease, or other restrictive settings in the
 community, or the secure treatment program at Porterville Developmental Center. These updates may be made in conjunction with planned quarterly updates on closure activities for developmental centers.

(d) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 16.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.16.

(a) (1) On or before January 10, 2023, and in conjunction with the Governor’s proposed 2023–24 budget, the State Department of Developmental Services shall submit to the Legislature an updated version of the safety net plan that was originally submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4474.15.

(2) The updated plan shall be developed in consultation with stakeholders and shall do all of the following:

(A) Evaluate the progress made to create a safety net, including services or residences intended to facilitate transitions or diversions from institutions for mental disease, the Canyon Springs Community Facility, the secure treatment program at Porterville Developmental
 Center, carceral settings such as prisons or jails, or other restrictive settings. This evaluation shall include data on the number of consumers who transitioned from those facilities since 2019, and to which setting type or living option.

(B) Identify areas the stakeholder community suggests evaluating and recommendations from the stakeholder community, which may include, but is not limited to, best practices for supporting individuals at risk of placement in restrictive settings, expanding or refining existing service or models of care, and developing new models of care for individuals whom private sector vendors cannot or will not serve.

(C) Provide data on the number of adolescents and adults with complex needs, statewide and by regional center, the number of special incidents involving restraints, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section
 54327 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, and the number of admissions to institutions for mental diseases funded by regional centers and to the Canyon Springs Community Facility between January 1, 2020, and December 31, 2021.

(D) The department’s strategic planning process, including how the department identifies service gaps, and how the department plans to address future needs in the community.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2023, and until December 31, 2026, the department shall provide quarterly updates to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the steps foreseen, planned, and completed in the development of services under the department’s update to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Commencing July 1, 2023, and until December 31, 2026, the department shall make
 quarterly updates to the plan available on its internet website.

(d) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) For purposes of this section, “adolescents and adults with complex needs” has the same meaning as a “consumer with complex needs,” as defined in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 4640.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 13.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.17.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Supplemental Report of the 2014–15 Budget Package required the State Department of Developmental Services to provide quarterly briefings to update legislative staff about the closures of developmental centers. Chapter 18 of the Statutes of 2017 expanded the scope of these briefings to include information about the development of community-based crisis services following the developmental center closures. The quarterly briefings have evolved to provide detailed information about the development of the community-based safety net, including information about the physical homes and wrap-around and mobile crisis services intended to prevent, deescalate, and treat consumers in crisis.

(2) The quarterly briefings have provided a valuable opportunity for the department and legislative staff to convene and discuss key issues during the developmental center closure process. They have kept legislative staff, and consequently Members of the Legislature, informed about the department’s progress, challenges, and strategies as it transitioned consumers from a developmental center or an institution into the community and developed a community-based safety net.

(3) The imminent final closure of the developmental centers provides an opportunity to consider the ongoing purpose of the quarterly briefings. Once the final developmental center closures are complete, the quarterly briefings can provide an avenue for the department and legislative staff to maintain an important ongoing dialogue about key issues facing the developmental services system. The quarterly briefings will
 allow the department to keep legislative staff informed about its approach to, and progress in, handling various changes in policy and modes of service delivery. This will be especially important as the consumer population continues to grow and change and as the system continues to move toward consumer choice and community integration. The disposition of the developmental center properties may continue to be a point of inquiry until that subject comes to a conclusion.

(4) An important feature of the current briefings has been the department’s willingness to adapt the content over time based on feedback from legislative staff. Mindful of the fact that preparing materials and presentations for these briefings requires department staff resources, the ongoing nature of the quarterly briefings should also remain flexible to both meet the needs of the Legislature and the department’s capacity to prepare for the briefings. Through the briefing
 discussions themselves, department leadership and legislative staff should come to an agreement about what data and information should be tracked and provided regularly at each briefing, based on what is feasible for the department to provide and considering the priorities of the Legislature. In addition, the department and legislative staff can regularly discuss the range of issues and level of detail that should be provided at briefings, recognizing that every issue cannot be covered at every briefing and that the relative importance of individual issues will shift over time.

(5) As the quarterly briefings related to the developmental center closures wind down in the 2019–20 fiscal year, the department and legislative staff could use some of the time in those meetings to discuss and determine the content of the subsequent quarterly briefings. Appreciating that the priorities of the Legislature shift over time, and depending on the
 department’s capacity, the particular topics and level of detail provided in the briefings can be discussed and revisited on a regular basis, such as annually.

(b) Commencing with the first planned quarterly briefing after January 1, 2020, the department shall provide information on topics at quarterly briefings with legislative staff of the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature addressing some or all of the following, pursuant to the planning discussion described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a):

(1) Consumer health and safety, including safety net and crisis services.

(2) The person-centered approach to planning, coordinating, delivering, and receiving services, including caseload ratio updates, compliance with home- and community-based services rules, competitive integrated employment, and
 housing supports.

(3) Quality outcomes for consumers.

(4) Efforts to identify and reduce disparities in regional center services.

(5) Community
 resource development plans, pursuant to Section 4418.25, by regional center, and difficulties or issues in the provision of services or development of resources.

(6) Implementation of any rate changes pending and being implemented.

(7) Progress in closing disparity gaps identified by the department’s equity dashboard, as it evolves over time with input from the
 community.

(8) Regional center accountability, transparency, and oversight efforts.

(9) Status on the development of Group Homes for Children with Special Health Care Needs, including information on how the needs of regional center consumers are assessed when developing new homes.

(10) Status on the implementation of the provisional eligibility requirement of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4512.

(11) Information pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 7505.

(12) Status on the development of a training curriculum for direct service professionals, pursuant to Section 4511.5.

(13) The most recent data, appropriately deidentified to protect the privacy of individuals, regarding average per capita purchase of service expenditures for all age groups by race, ethnicity, residence type, age, and other factors, in addition to any other data demonstrating the status of progress towards eliminating racial, ethnic, and other disparities. For purposes of this paragraph, the department may present dashboards for data and equity published on its internet website.

(14) On an annual basis, status of the department’s efforts to improve oversight of special incidents, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 54327 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, and respond to special incident trends. This annual status update shall include a summary of the most recent annual report regarding special incidents involving individuals with
 developmental disabilities served by regional centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 4.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may operate any facility, provide its employees to assist in the operation of any facility, or provide other necessary services and supports if, in the discretion of the department, it determines that the activity will assist in meeting the goal of successfully transitioning developmental center residents to community living or deflecting the admission of individuals with developmental disabilities to a developmental center, an institution for mental disease, an out-of-state placement, a general acute care hospital, or an acute psychiatric hospital. The department may contract with any entity for the use of the department’s employees to provide services and supports in furtherance of this goal.

(b) The
 department shall prepare a report on the use of the department’s employees in providing services in the community pursuant to this section. The report shall include data on the number and classification of state employees working in the community program. The report shall include recommendations on whether the program should be continued or ways in which the program may be improved. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the report shall be submitted with the Governor’s proposed budget for the 2015–16 fiscal year to the fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature and annually thereafter.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 17.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 18 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may operate any facility, provide its employees to assist in the operation of any facility, or provide other necessary services and supports if, in the discretion of the department, it determines that the activity will assist in meeting the goal of successfully transitioning developmental center residents to community living or deflecting the admission of individuals with developmental disabilities to a developmental center, an institution for mental disease, an out-of-state placement, a general acute care hospital, or an acute psychiatric hospital. The department may contract with any entity for the use of the department’s employees to provide services and supports in furtherance of this goal.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 18.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.3.

The provisions of Section 10411 of the Public Contract Code shall not apply to any person who provides developmental services and supports to individuals transitioning from a developmental center to community living or to individuals with developmental disabilities at risk of admission to a developmental center, an institution for mental disease, an out-of-state placement, a general acute care hospital, or an acute psychiatric hospital, pursuant to Section 4474.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 30, Sec. 12.   (SB 856)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall verify that the State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of Health Care Services have established protocols in place between the departments, as well as with the regional centers and health care plans participating in the Medi-Cal program who will be providing services, including health, dental, and vision care, to people with developmental disabilities transitioning from Agnews Developmental Center and Lanterman Developmental Center.

The Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall provide written verification of the establishment of these protocols to the Joint
 Legislative Budget Committee, as well as to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature that oversee health and human services programs.

The purpose of the protocols is to ensure that a mutual goal of providing appropriate, high-quality care and services to children and adults who have developmental disabilities in order to optimize the health and welfare of each individual. Further, the purpose of the protocols is to ensure that all involved parties, including consumers and families, the state, regional centers, and providers, are clear as to their roles and responsibilities, and are appropriately accountable for optimizing the health and welfare of each individual.

The protocols, at a minimum, shall address enrollment for services, all referral practices, including those to specialty care, authorization practices for services of all involved parties, coordination of case management services, education and training
 services to be provided, the management of medical records, and provider reimbursement methods. These protocols shall be provided to the consumers and their families, and be made available to the public upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 717, Sec. 120.   (SB 853)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.5.

(a) In order to meet the unique medical health needs of consumers transitioning from Agnews Developmental Center into Alameda, San Mateo, and Santa Clara Counties pursuant to the Plan for the Closure of Agnews Developmental Center, and consumers transitioning from Lanterman Developmental Center into various health plans in central and southern California counties pursuant to the Plan for the Closure of Lanterman Developmental Center, whose individual program plans document the need for coordinated medical and specialty care that cannot be met using the traditional Medi-Cal fee-for-service system, services provided under the contract shall be provided by Medi-Cal managed care health plans that are currently operational in these counties. For consumers transitioning from Agnews
 Developmental Center, the Medi-Cal managed care health plan shall be a county organized health system or a local initiative if consumers, where applicable, choose to enroll. For consumers transitioning from Lanterman Developmental Center, the Medi-Cal managed care health plan shall be any plan operating in the various counties if consumers choose to enroll or, where applicable, are enrolled by mandate pursuant to Section 14182. Reimbursement shall be by the State Department of Health Care Services for all Medi-Cal services provided under the contract that are not reimbursed by the Medicare Program.

(b) (1) Medi-Cal managed care health plans enrolling consumers transitioning from Agnews Developmental Center as referred to in subdivision (a) shall be further reimbursed for the reasonable cost of administrative services.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c),
 Medi-Cal managed care health plans enrolling consumers transitioning from Lanterman Developmental Center as referred to in subdivision (a) shall be paid a full-risk capitation payment.

(3) “Administrative services” pursuant to this subdivision include, but are not limited to, coordination of care and case management not provided by a regional center, provider credentialing and contracting, quality oversight, assuring member access to covered services, consultation with Agnews Developmental Center staff, regional center staff, State Department of Developmental Services staff, contractors, and family members, and financial management of the program, including claims processing. “Reasonable cost” means the actual cost incurred by the Medi-Cal managed care health plan, including both direct and indirect costs incurred by the Medi-Cal managed care health plan, in the performance of administrative services, but shall not include any incurred costs
 found by the State Department of Health Care Services to be unnecessary for the efficient delivery of necessary health services. Payment for administrative services shall continue on a reasonable cost basis until sufficient cost experience exists to allow these costs to be part of an all-inclusive capitation rate covering both administrative services and direct patient care services.

(c) Until the State Department of Health Care Services is able to determine by actuarial methods, prospective per capita rates of payment for services for those members who enroll in the Medi-Cal managed care health plans specified in subdivision (a), the State Department of Health Care Services shall reimburse the Medi-Cal managed care health plans for the net reasonable cost of direct patient care services and supplies set forth in the scope of services in the contract between the Medi-Cal managed care health plans and the State Department of Health Care Services
 and that are not reimbursed by the Medicare Program. “Net reasonable cost” means the actual cost incurred by the Medi-Cal managed care health plans, as measured by the Medi-Cal managed care health plan’s payments to providers of services and supplies, less payments made to the plans by third parties other than Medicare, and shall not include any incurred cost found to be unnecessary by the State Department of Health Care Services in the efficient delivery of necessary health services. Reimbursement shall be accomplished by the State Department of Health Care Services making estimated payments at reasonable intervals, with these estimates being reconciled to actual net reasonable cost at least semiannually.

(d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall seek any approval necessary for implementation of this section from the federal government, for purposes of federal financial participation under Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42
 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available pursuant to necessary federal approvals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3, Sec. 90.   (AB 97)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4474.6.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of Health Care Services shall coordinate the transition of health care services for Medi-Cal eligible consumers who are transitioning from a developmental center into the community.

(b) In order to meet the unique medical health needs of consumers who will be transitioning from a developmental center into the community, whose individual program plans document the need for coordinated medical and specialty care, and who are Medi-Cal eligible, the State Department of Health Care Services shall issue transition requirements including referral practices, service authorization practices, coordination of case management services,
 education and training services, and the management and sharing of medical records, to applicable Medi-Cal managed care health plans and monitor compliance. These transition requirements shall include, but are not limited to, processes for individuals assigned to a Medi-Cal managed care plan which promote coordination of care during and following the transition, identification of providers prior to a transition occurring, and the continuation of medically necessary covered services. These processes shall be described in a transition plan which will be shared with stakeholders prior to being finalized. The final transition plan shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than December 31, 2016.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in
 whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.
